Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE J. MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

CHAPTER 721. INSCRIPTION REQUIRED ON STATE, MUNICIPAL, AND COUNTY MOTOR VEHICLES

Sec. 721.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "state agency" means a department, bureau, board, commission, or office of state government.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 721.002. INSCRIPTION REQUIRED ON STATE-OWNED MOTOR VEHICLES. (a) The official having control of a state-owned motor vehicle shall have printed on each side of the vehicle the word "Texas," followed by the title of the state agency having custody of the vehicle.

(b) The inscription must be in a color sufficiently different from the body of the motor vehicle so that the lettering is plainly legible at a distance of not less than 100 feet.

(c) The title of the state agency must be in letters not less than two inches high.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 721.003. EXEMPTION FROM INSCRIPTION REQUIREMENT FOR CERTAIN STATE-OWNED MOTOR VEHICLES. (a) The governing bodies of the following state agencies or divisions by rule may exempt from the requirements of Section 721.002 a motor vehicle that is under the control and custody of the agency or division:

(1) Texas Commission on Fire Protection;

(2) Texas State Board of Pharmacy;

(3) Department of State Health Services and Department of Aging and Disability Services;

(4) Department of Public Safety of the State of Texas;

(5) Texas Department of Criminal Justice;

(6) Board of Pardons and Paroles;

(7) Parks and Wildlife Department;

(8) Railroad Commission of Texas;

(9) Texas Alcoholic Beverage Commission;

(10) Texas Department of Banking;

(11) Department of Savings and Mortgage Lending;

(12) Texas Juvenile Justice Department;

(13) Texas Commission on Environmental Quality;

(14) Texas Lottery Commission;

(15) the office of the attorney general;

(16) Texas Department of Insurance;

(17) Texas Military Department; and

(18) an agency that receives an appropriation under an article of the General Appropriations Act that appropriates money to the legislature.

(b) Repealed by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 81, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

(c) A rule adopted under this section must specify:

(1) the purpose served by not printing on the motor vehicle the inscription required by Section 721.002; and

(2) the primary use of the motor vehicle.

(d) A rule adopted under this section is not effective until the rule is filed with the secretary of state.

(e) A rule adopted by the Texas Lottery Commission under Subsection (a) may exempt from the requirements of Section 721.002 only a motor vehicle used exclusively for surveillance purposes.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 81, Sec. 1, 2, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 921 (H.B. 3167), Sec. 6.066, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1308 (S.B. 909), Sec. 48, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 734 (H.B. 1549), Sec. 147, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 303 (S.B. 795), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 721.004. INSCRIPTION REQUIRED ON MUNICIPAL AND COUNTY-OWNED MOTOR VEHICLES AND HEAVY EQUIPMENT. (a) The office having control of a motor vehicle or piece of heavy equipment owned by a municipality or county shall have printed on each side of the vehicle or equipment the name of the municipality or county, followed by the title of the department or office having custody of the vehicle or equipment.

(b) The inscription must be in a color sufficiently different from the body of the vehicle or equipment so that the lettering is plainly legible.

(c) The title of the department or office must be in letters plainly legible at a distance of not less than 100 feet.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 721.005. EXEMPTION FROM INSCRIPTION REQUIREMENT FOR CERTAIN MUNICIPAL AND COUNTY-OWNED MOTOR VEHICLES.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body of a municipality may exempt from the requirements of Section 721.004:

(1) an automobile when used to perform an official duty by a:

(A) police department;

(B) magistrate as defined by Article 2.09, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(C) medical examiner;

(D) municipal code enforcement officer designated to enforce environmental criminal laws; or

(E) municipal fire marshal or arson investigator; or

(2) an automobile used by a municipal employee only when conducting an investigation involving suspected fraud or other mismanagement within the municipality.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(a) The governing body of a municipality may exempt from the requirements of Section 721.004:

(1) an automobile when used to perform an official duty by a:

(A) police department;

(B) magistrate as defined by Article 2A.151, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(C) medical examiner;

(D) municipal code enforcement officer designated to enforce environmental criminal laws; or

(E) municipal fire marshal or arson investigator; or

(2) an automobile used by a municipal employee only when conducting an investigation involving suspected fraud or other mismanagement within the municipality.

Text of subsection effective until January 01, 2025

(b) The commissioners court of a county may exempt from the requirements of Section 721.004:

(1) an automobile when used to perform an official duty by a:

(A) police department;

(B) sheriff's office;

(C) constable's office;

(D) criminal district attorney's office;

(E) district attorney's office;

(F) county attorney's office;

(G) magistrate as defined by Article 2.09, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(H) county fire marshal's office; or

(I) medical examiner; or

(2) a juvenile probation department vehicle used to transport children, when used to perform an official duty.

Text of subsection effective on January 01, 2025

(b) The commissioners court of a county may exempt from the requirements of Section 721.004:

(1) an automobile when used to perform an official duty by a:

(A) police department;

(B) sheriff's office;

(C) constable's office;

(D) criminal district attorney's office;

(E) district attorney's office;

(F) county attorney's office;

(G) magistrate as defined by Article 2A.151, Code of Criminal Procedure;

(H) county fire marshal's office; or

(I) medical examiner; or

(2) a juvenile probation department vehicle used to transport children, when used to perform an official duty.

(c) An exemption provided under this section does not apply to a contract deputy.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 355, Sec. 1, eff. May 27, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 46, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 62, Sec. 17.38, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 66, Sec. 1, eff. May 14, 2001; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 140, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 45 (S.B. 526), Sec. 1, eff. May 8, 2007.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 765 (H.B. 4504), Sec. 2.179, eff. January 1, 2025.

Sec. 721.006. OPERATION OF VEHICLE IN VIOLATION OF CHAPTER; OFFENSE. (a) A person commits an offense if the person:

(1) operates on a municipal street or on a highway a motor vehicle or piece of equipment that does not have the inscription required by this chapter; or

(2) uses a motor vehicle that is exempt by rule under Section 721.003, and that use is not expressly specified by the rule.

(b) An offense under this section is a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $25 or more than $100.

Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 165, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.